en: unhydrogenated coconut oil
bg: нехидрогенирано кокосово масло
fr: huile de coco non-hydrogénée, huile de coprah non hydrogénée
hr: nehidrogenirano kokosovo ulje
it: olio di cocco non idrogenato

en: hydrogenated coconut oil, fully hydrogenated coconut oil
bg: хидрогенирано кокосово масло, напълно хидрогенирано кокосово масло
de: hydriertes Kokosöl, vollständig hydriertes Kokosöl
es: aceite de coco totalmente hidrogenado, aceite de coco hidrogenado
fi: kokonaan kovetettu kookosöljy, kokonaan kovetettua kookosöljyä
fr: huile de noix de coco totalement hydrogénée, huile de coprah totalement hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirano kokosovo ulje
it: Olio di cocco idrogenato
nb: hydrogenert kokosolje
pl: utwardzony olej kokosowy
sv: fullhärdad kokosolja

en: fractionated coconut oil
de: Fraktioniertes Kokosnussöl, Fraktioniertes Kokosöl
es: aceite de coco fraccionado
fi: fraktioitu kookosöljy
fr: huile de coco fractionnée
hr: frakcioniranog kokosovog ulja
it: olio di cocco frazionato
sv: fraktionerad kokosolja

en: refined coconut oil
de: raffiniertes Kokosöl, raffiniertes Kokosnussöl
es: aceite de coco refinado
fr: Huile de noix de coco raffinée
hr: rafinirano kokosovo ulje
it: olio di cocco raffinato
pl: rafinowany olej kokosowy, olej kokosowy rafinowany
ru: масло кокосовое рафинированное дезодорированное

en: MCT oil, Medium-chain triglycerides oil
it: olio MCT

en: coconut fat
bg: кокосова мазнина, кокосова
ca: greix de coco
cs: kokosový tuk
da: kokosfedt
de: Kokosfett, Kokosnussfett
es: grasa de coco, grasa vegetal de coco
et: kookosrasv
fi: kookosrasva, kookosrasvaa
fr: matière grasse de noix de coco, graisse de noix de coco, graisse de coco, matière grasse végétale de coprah, matière grasse de coprah
hr: kokosova mast
hu: kókuszzsír
it: grasso di cocco
lt: kokoso riebalai
lv: kokosriekstu tauki
nb: kokosfett
nl: kokosvet
nn: kokosfeitt
pl: tłuszcz kokosowy, tłuszcz roślinny kokosowy, tłuszcze roślinne kokosowy
pt: gordura de coco, lípido de coco
sl: kokosova maščoba
sv: kokosfett, kokosnötfett, kokosnöt fett

en: coconut butter, creamed coconut
bg: кокосово масло
de: Kokosbutter
es: manteca de coco
hr: kokosov maslac
it: Burro cocco
pl: masło kokosowe
ro: unt de cocos

en: fully hydrogenated coconut fat
da: fuldhærdet kokosfett
de: ganz gehärtetes kokosfett
es: grasa de coco totalmente hidrogenada
fi: kokonaan kovetettu kookosrasva, kokonaan kovetettua kookosrasvaa
fr: graisse de coco totalement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenizirana kokosova mast
it: grassi totalmente idrogenati da cocco
nb: fullhydrogenert kokosfett, fullherdet kokosfett
nl: geheel gehard kokosvet
pl: całkowicie utwardzony tłuszcz kokosowy, tłuszcz kokosowy całkowicie utwardzony
sv: fullhärdat kokosfett

en: unhydrogenated palm and coconut oil, unhydrogenated palm and coconut fat
hr: nehidrogenirano palmino i kokosovo ulje
it: olio di palma e di cocco non idrogenato
nl: ongehard plantaardig palm en kokosvet

en: oat oil
cs: ovesný olej
de: Haferöl, Haferkernöl
es: aceite vegetal avena
hr: zobeno ulje
it: olio di avena

en: olive oil, olive vegetable oil
ar: زيت زيتون
az: Zeytun yağı
ba: Зәйтүн майы
be: Аліўкавы алей
bg: Зехтин, дървено масло, маслиново масло
bs: Maslinovo ulje
ca: Oli d'oliva
cs: Olivový olej
da: olivenolie
de: Olivenöl
el: Ελαιόλαδο
eo: Oliv-oleo
es: aceite de oliva
et: Oliiviõli
eu: Oliba olio
fa: روغن زیتون
fi: oliiviöljy
fr: huile d'olive, huiles végétales d'olive
gl: Aceite de oliva
he: שמן זית
hi: जैतून का तेल
hr: maslinovo ulje
hu: olívaolaj, olivaolaj
id: Minyak zaitun
is: Ólífuolía
it: olio d'oliva, olio di oliva
ja: オリーブ・オイル, オリーブ油
ka: ზეითუნის ზეთი
kk: Зәйтүн майы
kn: ಆಲಿವ್ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 올리브유
la: Oleum
lt: Alyvuogių aliejus
lv: Olīveļļa
mk: Маслиново масло
ml: ഒലിവെണ്ണ
mr: ऑलिव्ह तेल
ms: Minyak zaitun
my: သံလွင်ဆီ
nb: Olivenolje
nl: olijfolie
nn: Olivenolje
no: olivenolje
oc: Òli d'oliva
pl: Olej oliwkowy, oliwa z oliwek
pt: azeite, azeite de oliva
ro: Ulei de măsline
ru: Оливковое масло
sa: जिततैलम्
sc: Ozu de olìa
sh: Maslinovo ulje
sk: Olivový olej
sl: Oljčno olje
sq: Vaji i ullirit
sr: Маслиново уље
sv: olivolja
ta: ஆலிவ் எண்ணெய்
te: ఆలివ్ నూనె
th: น้ำมันมะกอก
tl: Langis ng oliba
tr: Zeytinyağı
tt: Зәйтүн мае
uk: Оливкова олія
vi: Dầu ô liu
yi: שמן־זית
zh: 橄欖油

fr: huile d'olive de catégorie supérieure
it: olio di oliva di categoria superiore

en: black olives oil, black olive oil
de: Öl aus schwarzen Oliven
fr: huile d'olive noire, huile d'olives noires
hr: ulje crnih maslina
it: olio di olive nere
nl: zwarte olijvenolie
no: svart olivenolje

en: non-hydrogenated olive oil
bg: нехидрогениран зехтин, нехидрогенирано маслиново масло
de: ungehärtetes Olivenöl
fr: huile d'olive non hydrogénée
hr: nehidrogenirano maslinovo ulje
it: Olio di oliva non idrogenato
pt: azeite não hidrogenado, azeite de oliva não hidrogenado

en: virgin olive oil
bg: необработен зехтин
ca: Oli d'oliva verge
cs: Panenský olivový olej
da: jomfruolivenolie
de: natives Olivenöl
es: aceite de oliva virgen
fi: neitsytoliiviöljy
fr: huile d'olive vierge
hr: djevičansko maslinovo ulje
hu: szűz olívaolaj
it: olio d'oliva vergine
lv: neapstrādāta olīveļļa
nl: olijfolie van de eerste persing
no: virgin olivenolje, jomfru olivenolje
pl: Oliwa z oliwek z pierwszego tłoczenia, Oliwa z oliwek virgin
pt: azeite de oliva virgem, azeite virgem
sv: jungfruolivolja, virgin olivolja

en: extra virgin olive oil
bg: екстра върджин зехтин, зехтин екстра върджин, маслиново масло extra virgin, дървено масло extra virgin
ca: Oli d'oliva verge extra, oli OVE
cs: Extra panenský olivový olej
da: ekstra jomfruolivenolie, ekstra jomfru olivenolie
de: natives Olivenöl Extra, Olivenöl nativ extra, extra natives Olivenöl, Olivenöl extra vergine, Extra Virgin Olivenöl
el: εξαιρετικό Παρθένο ελαιόλαδο
es: aceite de oliva virgen extra, aceite extra virgen de oliva, aceite de oliva extra virgen
fi: ekstra-neitsytoliiviöljy, ekstraneitsytoliiviöljy
fr: huile d'olive extra vierge, huile d'olive vierge extra, huile d'olive vierge extra extraite à froid, huile d'olive de catégorie supérieure obtenue directement des olives et uniquement par des procédés mécaniques, huile extra vierge d'olive
hr: ekstra djevičansko maslinovo ulje
hu: extra szűz olívaolaj, extraszűz olívaolaj
it: olio d'oliva extra vergine, olio extravergine di oliva, olio di oliva extra vergine, olio extra vergine di oliva, olio extra vergine d'oliva, olio extravergine d'oliva, olio vegetale extravergine d'oliva
nl: olijfolie extra vierge, extra olijfolie van de eerste persing, extra vierge olijfolie, extra vergine olijfolie, Extra vierge olijfolie van de eerste persing
no: extra virgin olivenolje, ekstra virgin olivenolje, ekstra jomfru olivenolje
pl: oliwa z oliwek extra virgin, oliwa extra virgin, oliwa z oliwek ekstra virgin, oliwa ekstra virgin
pt: Azeite extra virgem, azeite virgem extra, azeite de oliva extra virgem, azeite de oliva virgem extra
sv: extra jungfru olivolja, olivolja extra virgin, extra jungfruolja, extra fin olivolja, extra virgin olivolja, extra jungfruolivolja

en: Spanish extra virgin olive oil
da: spansk ekstra jomfruolivenolie
sv: spansk extra jungfruolivolja, spansk extra jungfruolja

en: organic olive oil
bg: био зехтин, био маслиново масло
da: økologisk olivenolie
de: Bio-Olivenöl
fi: luomu oliiviöljy
fr: Huile d'olive bio
hr: organsko maslinovo ulje
hu: bio olívaolaj, bio olíva olaj
it: Olio di oliva biologico
nl: olie van biologische olijven
pl: organiczna oliwa z oliwek
pt: azeite biológico, azeite de oliva biológico
sv: ekologisk olivolja

en: refined olive oil
bg: рафиниран зехтин, рафинирано маслиново масло
de: raffiniertes Olivenöl, Olivenöl raffiniert
es: aceite de oliva refinado
fr: huile d'olive rafinée
hr: rafinirano maslinovo ulje
it: Olio di oliva raffinato
pl: rafinowana oliwa z oliwek
pt: azeite refinado, azeite de oliva refinado
sv: raffinerad olivolja

en: unrefined olive oil
hr: nerafinirano maslinovo ulje
it: olio di oliva non raffinato
nl: ongeraffineerde olijfolie
sv: oraffinerad olivolja